Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-3301 to 38-3335 shall be known and may be cited as the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.

Laws 1967, c. 439, § 1, p. 1353;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 54;

Laws 2000, LB 833, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,153;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1083;

Laws 2009, LB463, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB687, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB596, § 1.